Oklahoma, session 2025, SB238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1357, as


last amended by Section 4, Chapter 363, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 1357), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1357. Exemptions – General. There are hereby


specifically exempted from the tax levied by the Oklahoma Sales Tax


Code:


1. Transportation of school pupils to and from elementary


schools or high schools in motor or other vehicles;


2. Transportation of persons where the fare of each person does


not exceed One Dollar ($1.00), or local transportation of persons


within the corporate limits of a municipality except by taxicabs;



Req. No. 736 Page 1


3. Sales for resale to persons engaged in the business of


reselling the articles purchased, whether within or without the


state, provided that such sales to residents of this state are made


to persons to whom sales tax permits have been issued as provided in


the Oklahoma Sales Tax Code. This exemption shall not apply to the


sales of articles made to persons holding permits when such persons


purchase items for their use and which they are not regularly


engaged in the business of reselling; neither shall this exemption


apply to sales of tangible personal property to peddlers, solicitors


and other salespersons who do not have an established place of


business and a sales tax permit. The exemption provided by this


paragraph shall apply to sales of motor fuel or diesel fuel to a


Group Five vendor, but the use of such motor fuel or diesel fuel by


the Group Five vendor shall not be exempt from the tax levied by the


Oklahoma Sales Tax Code. The purchase of motor fuel or diesel fuel


is exempt from sales tax when the motor fuel is for shipment outside


this state and consumed by a common carrier by rail in the conduct


of its business. The sales tax shall apply to the purchase of motor


fuel or diesel fuel in Oklahoma by a common carrier by rail when


such motor fuel is purchased for fueling, within this state, of any


locomotive or other motorized flanged wheel equipment;


4. Sales of advertising space in newspapers and periodicals;


5. Sales of programs relating to sporting and entertainment


events, and sales of advertising on billboards (including signage,

Req. No. 736 Page 2


posters, panels, marquees or on other similar surfaces, whether


indoors or outdoors) or in programs relating to sporting and


entertainment events, and sales of any advertising, to be displayed


at or in connection with a sporting event, via the Internet,


electronic display devices or through public address or broadcast


systems. The exemption authorized by this paragraph shall be


effective for all sales made on or after January 1, 2001;


6. Sales of any advertising, other than the advertising


described by paragraph 5 of this section, via the Internet,


electronic display devices or through the electronic media including


radio, public address or broadcast systems, television (whether


through closed circuit broadcasting systems or otherwise), and cable


and satellite television, and the servicing of any advertising


devices;


7. Eggs, feed, supplies, machinery, and equipment purchased by


persons regularly engaged in the business of raising worms, fish,


any insect, or any other form of terrestrial or aquatic animal life


and used for the purpose of raising same for marketing. This


exemption shall only be granted and extended to the purchaser when


the items are to be used and in fact are used in the raising of


animal life as set out above. Each purchaser shall certify, in


writing, on the invoice or sales ticket retained by the vendor that


the purchaser is regularly engaged in the business of raising such


animal life and that the items purchased will be used only in such

Req. No. 736 Page 3


business. The vendor shall certify to the Oklahoma Tax Commission


that the price of the items has been reduced to grant the full


benefit of the exemption. Violation hereof by the purchaser or


vendor shall be a misdemeanor;


8. Sale of natural or artificial gas and electricity, and


associated delivery or transmission services, when sold exclusively


for residential use. Provided, this exemption shall not apply to


any sales tax levied by a city or town, or a county or any other


jurisdiction in this state;


9. In addition to the exemptions authorized by Section 1357.6


of this title, sales of drugs sold pursuant to a prescription


written for the treatment of human beings by a person licensed to


prescribe the drugs, and sales of insulin and medical oxygen.


Provided, this exemption shall not apply to over-the-counter drugs;


10. Transfers of title or possession of empty, partially


filled, or filled returnable oil and chemical drums to any person


who is not regularly engaged in the business of selling, reselling


or otherwise transferring empty, partially filled or filled


returnable oil drums;


11. Sales of one-way utensils, paper napkins, paper cups,


disposable hot containers, and other one-way carry out materials to


a vendor of meals or beverages;


12. Sales of food or food products for home consumption which


are purchased in whole or in part with coupons issued pursuant to

Req. No. 736 Page 4


the federal food stamp program as authorized by Sections 2011


through 2029 2036d of Title 7 of the United States Code, as to that


portion purchased with such coupons. The exemption provided for


such sales shall be inapplicable to such sales upon the effective


date of any federal law that removes the requirement of the


exemption as a condition for participation by the state in the


federal food stamp program;


13. Sales of food or food products, or any equipment or


supplies used in the preparation of the food or food products to or


by an organization which:


a. is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of


Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and


which provides and delivers prepared meals for home


consumption to elderly or homebound persons as part of


a program commonly known as “Meals on Wheels” or


“Mobile Meals”, or


b. is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of


Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and


which receives federal funding pursuant to the Older


Americans Act of 1965, as amended, for the purpose of


providing nutrition programs for the care and benefit


of elderly persons;

Req. No. 736 Page 5


14. a. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or


by organizations which are exempt from taxation


pursuant to the provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,


Section 501(c)(3), and:


(1) are primarily involved in the collection and


distribution of food and other household products


to other organizations that facilitate the


distribution of such products to the needy and


such distributee organizations are exempt from


taxation pursuant to the provisions of Section


501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), or


(2) facilitate the distribution of such products to


the needy.


b. Sales made in the course of business for profit or


savings, competing with other persons engaged in the


same or similar business shall not be exempt under


this paragraph;


15. Sales of tangible personal property or services to


children’s homes which are located on church-owned property and are


operated by organizations exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3);

Req. No. 736 Page 6


16. Sales of computers, data processing equipment, related


peripherals, and telephone, telegraph or telecommunications service


and equipment for use in a qualified aircraft maintenance or


manufacturing facility. For purposes of this paragraph, “qualified


aircraft maintenance or manufacturing facility” means a new or


expanding facility primarily engaged in aircraft repair, building or


rebuilding, whether or not on a factory basis, whose total cost of


construction exceeds the sum of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00)


and which employs at least two hundred fifty (250) new full-time-


equivalent employees, as certified by the Oklahoma Employment


Security Commission, upon completion of the facility. In order to


qualify for the exemption provided for by this paragraph, the cost


of the items purchased by the qualified aircraft maintenance or


manufacturing facility shall equal or exceed the sum of Two Million


Dollars ($2,000,000.00);


17. Sales of tangible personal property consumed or


incorporated in the construction or expansion of a qualified


aircraft maintenance or manufacturing facility as defined in


paragraph 16 of this section. For purposes of this paragraph, sales


made to a contractor or subcontractor that has previously entered


into a contractual relationship with a qualified aircraft


maintenance or manufacturing facility for construction or expansion


of such a facility shall be considered sales made to a qualified


aircraft maintenance or manufacturing facility;

Req. No. 736 Page 7


18. Sales of the following telecommunications services:


a. Interstate interstate and International “800 service”


international 800 service. “800 service” means a


telecommunications service that allows a caller to


dial a toll-free number without incurring a charge for


the call. The service is typically marketed under the


name “800”, “855”, “866”, “877” and “888” toll-free


calling, and any subsequent numbers designated by the


Federal Communications Commission,


b. Interstate interstate and International “900 service”


international 900 service. “900 service” means an


inbound toll telecommunications service purchased by a


subscriber that allows the subscriber’s customers to


call in to the subscriber’s prerecorded announcement


or live service. 900 service does not include the


charge for: collection services provided by the


seller of the telecommunications services to the


subscriber, or service or product sold by the


subscriber to the subscriber’s customer. The service


is typically marketed under the name “900” service,


and any subsequent numbers designated by the Federal


Communications Commission,


c. Interstate interstate and International “private


communications service” international private

Req. No. 736 Page 8


communications service. “Private communications


service” means a telecommunications service that


entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of


a communications channel or group of channels between


or among termination points, regardless of the manner


in which such channel or channels are connected, and


includes switching capacity, extension lines, stations


and any other associated services that are provided in


connection with the use of such channel or channels,


d. “Value-added nonvoice data service” value-added


nonvoice data service. “Value-added nonvoice data


service” means a service that otherwise meets the


definition of telecommunications services in which


computer processing applications are used to act on


the form, content, code or protocol of the information


or data primarily for a purpose other than


transmission, conveyance, or routing,


e. Interstate interstate and International international


telecommunications service which is:


(1) rendered by a company for private use within its


organization, or


(2) used, allocated or distributed by a company to


its affiliated group,



Req. No. 736 Page 9


f. Regulatory regulatory assessments and charges


including charges to fund the Oklahoma Universal


Service Fund, the Oklahoma Lifeline Fund and the


Oklahoma High Cost Fund, and


g. Telecommunications telecommunications nonrecurring


charges including but not limited to the installation,


connection, change, or initiation of


telecommunications services which are not associated


with a retail consumer sale;


19. Sales of railroad track spikes manufactured and sold for


use in this state in the construction or repair of railroad tracks,


switches, sidings, and turnouts;


20. Sales of aircraft and aircraft parts provided such sales


occur at a qualified aircraft maintenance facility. As used in this


paragraph, “qualified aircraft maintenance facility” means a


facility operated by an air common carrier including one or more


component overhaul support buildings or structures in an area owned,


leased, or controlled by the air common carrier, at which there were


employed at least two thousand (2,000) full-time-equivalent


employees in the preceding year as certified by the Oklahoma


Employment Security Commission and which is primarily related to the


fabrication, repair, alteration, modification, refurbishing,


maintenance, building, or rebuilding of commercial aircraft or


aircraft parts used in air common carriage. For purposes of this

Req. No. 736 Page 10


paragraph, “air common carrier” shall also include members of an


affiliated group as defined by Section 1504 of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 1504. Beginning July


1, 2012, the exemption shall include sales of machinery, tools,


supplies, equipment, and related tangible personal property and


services used or consumed in the repair, remodeling, or maintenance


of aircraft, aircraft engines or aircraft component parts which


occur at a qualified aircraft maintenance facility;


21. Sales of machinery and equipment purchased and used by


persons and establishments primarily engaged in computer services


and data processing:


a. as defined under Industry Group Numbers 7372 and 7373


of the Standard Industrial Classification (SIC)


Manual, latest version, which derive at least fifty


percent (50%) of their annual gross revenues from the


sale of a product or service to an out-of-state buyer


or consumer, and


b. as defined under Industry Group Number 7374 of the SIC


Manual, latest version, which derive at least eighty


percent (80%) of their annual gross revenues from the


sale of a product or service to an out-of-state buyer


or consumer.


Eligibility for the exemption set out in this paragraph shall be


established, subject to review by the Tax Commission, by annually

Req. No. 736 Page 11


filing an affidavit with the Tax Commission stating that the


facility so qualifies and such information as required by the Tax


Commission. For purposes of determining whether annual gross


revenues are derived from sales to out-of-state buyers or consumers,


all sales to the federal government shall be considered to be to an


out-of-state buyer or consumer;


22. Sales of prosthetic devices to an individual for use by


such individual. For purposes of this paragraph, “prosthetic


device” shall have the same meaning as provided in Section 1357.6 of


this title, but shall not include corrective eye glasses, contact


lenses, or hearing aids;


23. Sales of tangible personal property or services to a motion


picture or television production company to be used or consumed in


connection with an eligible production. For purposes of this


paragraph, “eligible production” means a documentary, special, music


video or a television commercial or television program that will


serve as a pilot for or be a segment of an ongoing dramatic or


situation comedy series filmed or taped for network or national or


regional syndication or a feature-length motion picture intended for


theatrical release or for network or national or regional


syndication or broadcast. The provisions of this paragraph shall


apply to sales occurring on or after July 1, 1996. In order to


qualify for the exemption, the motion picture or television


production company shall file any documentation and information

Req. No. 736 Page 12


required to be submitted pursuant to rules promulgated by the Tax


Commission;


24. Sales of diesel fuel sold for consumption by commercial


vessels, barges and other commercial watercraft;


25. Sales of tangible personal property or services to tax-


exempt independent nonprofit biomedical research foundations that


provide educational programs for Oklahoma science students and


teachers and to tax-exempt independent nonprofit community blood


banks headquartered in this state;


26. Effective May 6, 1992, sales of wireless telecommunications


equipment to a vendor who subsequently transfers the equipment at no


charge or for a discounted charge to a consumer as part of a


promotional package or as an inducement to commence or continue a


contract for wireless telecommunications services;


27. Effective January 1, 1991, leases of rail transportation


cars to haul coal to coal-fired plants located in this state which


generate electric power;


28. Beginning July 1, 2005, sales of aircraft engine repairs,


modification, and replacement parts, sales of aircraft frame repairs


and modification, aircraft interior modification, and paint, and


sales of services employed in the repair, modification, and


replacement of parts of aircraft engines, aircraft frame and


interior repair and modification, and paint;



Req. No. 736 Page 13


29. Sales of materials and supplies to the owner or operator of


a ship, motor vessel, or barge that is used in interstate or


international commerce if the materials and supplies:


a. are loaded on the ship, motor vessel, or barge and


used in the maintenance and operation of the ship,


motor vessel, or barge, or


b. enter into and become component parts of the ship,


motor vessel, or barge;


30. Sales of tangible personal property made at estate sales at


which such property is offered for sale on the premises of the


former residence of the decedent by a person who is not required to


be licensed pursuant to the Transient Merchant Licensing Act, or who


is not otherwise required to obtain a sales tax permit for the sale


of such property pursuant to the provisions of Section 1364 of this


title; provided:


a. such sale or event may not be held for a period


exceeding three (3) consecutive days,


b. the sale must be conducted within six (6) months of


the date of death of the decedent, and


c. the exemption allowed by this paragraph shall not be


allowed for property that was not part of the


decedent’s estate;


31. Beginning January 1, 2004, sales of electricity and


associated delivery and transmission services, when sold exclusively

Req. No. 736 Page 14


for use by an oil and gas operator for reservoir dewatering projects


and associated operations commencing on or after July 1, 2003, in


which the initial water-to-oil ratio is greater than or equal to


five-to-one water-to-oil, and such oil and gas development projects


have been classified by the Corporation Commission as a reservoir


dewatering unit;


32. Sales of prewritten computer software that is delivered


electronically. For purposes of this paragraph, “delivered


electronically” means delivered to the purchaser by means other than


tangible storage media;


33. Sales of modular dwelling units when built at a production


facility and moved in whole or in parts, to be assembled on-site,


and permanently affixed to the real property and used for


residential or commercial purposes. The exemption provided by this


paragraph shall equal forty-five percent (45%) of the total sales


price of the modular dwelling unit. For purposes of this paragraph,


“modular dwelling unit” means a structure that is not subject to the


motor vehicle excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 2103 of this


title;


34. Sales of tangible personal property or services to:


a. persons who are residents of Oklahoma and have been


honorably discharged from active service in any branch


of the Armed Forces of the United States or Oklahoma


National Guard and who have been certified by the

Req. No. 736 Page 15


United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its


successor to be in receipt of disability compensation


at the one-hundred-percent rate and the disability


shall be permanent and have been sustained through


military action or accident or resulting from disease


contracted while in such active service and registered


with the veterans registry created by the Oklahoma


Department of Veterans Affairs, or


b. the surviving spouse of the person in subparagraph a


of this paragraph if the person is deceased and the


spouse has not remarried and the surviving spouse of a


person who is determined by the United States


Department of Defense or any branch of the United


States military to have died while in the line of duty


if the spouse has not remarried. Sales for the


benefit of an eligible person to a spouse of the


eligible person or to a member of the household in


which the eligible person resides and who is


authorized to make purchases on the person’s behalf,


when such eligible person is not present at the sale,


shall also be exempt for purposes of this paragraph.


The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall issue a separate


exemption card to a spouse of an eligible person or to


a member of the household in which the eligible person

Req. No. 736 Page 16


resides who is authorized to make purchases on the


person’s behalf, if requested by the eligible person.


Sales qualifying for the exemption authorized by this


paragraph shall not exceed Twenty-five Thousand


Dollars ($25,000.00) per year per individual while the


disabled veteran is living. Sales qualifying for the


exemption authorized by this paragraph shall not


exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per year for


an unremarried surviving spouse. Upon request of the


Tax Commission, a person asserting or claiming the


exemption authorized by this paragraph shall provide a


statement, executed under oath, that the total sales


amounts for which the exemption is applicable have not


exceeded Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per


year per living disabled veteran or One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) per year for an unremarried


surviving spouse. If the amount of such exempt sales


exceeds such amount, the sales tax in excess of the


authorized amount shall be treated as a direct sales


tax liability and may be recovered by the Tax


Commission in the same manner provided by law for


other taxes including penalty and interest. The Tax


Commission shall promulgate any rules necessary to


implement the provisions of this paragraph, which

Req. No. 736 Page 17


shall include rules providing for the disclosure of


information about persons eligible for the exemption


authorized in this paragraph to the Oklahoma


Department of Veterans Affairs, as authorized in


Section 205 of this title. For purposes of the


exemption authorized by this subparagraph, if the


disability determination that would have been made


while the disabled veteran was still living is not


made final until after the death of the disabled


veteran, the exemption authorized by this subparagraph


may still be claimed by the surviving spouse;


35. Sales of electricity to the operator, specifically


designated by the Corporation Commission, of a spacing unit or lease


from which oil is produced or attempted to be produced using


enhanced recovery methods including, but not limited to, increased


pressure in a producing formation through the use of water or


saltwater if the electrical usage is associated with and necessary


for the operation of equipment required to inject or circulate


fluids in a producing formation for the purpose of forcing oil or


petroleum into a wellbore for eventual recovery and production from


the wellhead. In order to be eligible for the sales tax exemption


authorized by this paragraph, the total content of oil recovered


after the use of enhanced recovery methods shall not exceed one


percent (1%) by volume. The exemption authorized by this paragraph

Req. No. 736 Page 18


shall be applicable only to the state sales tax rate and shall not


be applicable to any county or municipal sales tax rate;


36. Sales of intrastate charter and tour bus transportation.


As used in this paragraph, “intrastate charter and tour bus


transportation” means the transportation of persons from one


location in this state to another location in this state in a motor


vehicle which has been constructed in such a manner that it may


lawfully carry more than eighteen persons, and which is ordinarily


used or rented to carry persons for compensation. Provided, this


exemption shall not apply to regularly scheduled bus transportation


for the general public;


37. Sales of vitamins, minerals, and dietary supplements by a


licensed chiropractor to a person who is the patient of such


chiropractor at the physical location where the chiropractor


provides chiropractic care or services to such patient. The


provisions of this paragraph shall not be applicable to any drug,


medicine, or substance for which a prescription by a licensed


physician is required;


38. Sales of goods, wares, merchandise, tangible personal


property, machinery, and equipment to a web search portal located in


this state which derives at least eighty percent (80%) of its annual


gross revenue from the sale of a product or service to an out-of-


state buyer or consumer. For purposes of this paragraph, “web


search portal” means an establishment classified under NAICS North

Req. No. 736 Page 19


American Industry Classification System (NAICS) code 519130 which


operates websites that use a search engine to generate and maintain


extensive databases of Internet addresses and content in an easily


searchable format;


39. Sales of tangible personal property consumed or


incorporated in the construction or expansion of a facility for a


corporation organized under Section 437 et seq. of Title 18 of the


Oklahoma Statutes as a rural electric cooperative. For purposes of


this paragraph, sales made to a contractor or subcontractor that has


previously entered into a contractual relationship with a rural


electric cooperative for construction or expansion of a facility


shall be considered sales made to a rural electric cooperative;


40. Sales of tangible personal property or services to a


business primarily engaged in the repair of consumer electronic


goods including, but not limited to, cell phones, compact disc


players, personal computers, MP3 players, digital devices for the


storage and retrieval of information through hard-wired or wireless


computer or Internet connections, if the devices are sold to the


business by the original manufacturer of such devices and the


devices are repaired, refitted or refurbished for sale by the entity


qualifying for the exemption authorized by this paragraph directly


to retail consumers or if the devices are sold to another business


entity for sale to retail consumers;



Req. No. 736 Page 20


41. On or after July 1, 2019, and prior to July 1, 2024, sales


or leases of rolling stock when sold or leased by the manufacturer,


regardless of whether the purchaser is a public services corporation


engaged in business as a common carrier of property or passengers by


railway, for use or consumption by a common carrier directly in the


rendition of public service. For purposes of this paragraph,


“rolling stock” means locomotives, autocars, and railroad cars and


“sales or leases” includes railroad car maintenance and retrofitting


of railroad cars for their further use only on the railways;


42. Sales of gold, silver, platinum, palladium or other bullion


items such as coins and bars and legal tender of any nation, which


legal tender is sold according to its value as precious metal or as


an investment. As used in the paragraph, “bullion” means any


precious metal including, but not limited to, gold, silver,


platinum, and palladium, that is in such a state or condition that


its value depends upon its precious metal content and not its form.


The exemption authorized by this paragraph shall not apply to


fabricated metals that have been processed or manufactured for


artistic use or as jewelry; and


43. Recovery fees on the rental charge from any item of heavy


equipment property rental as provided for in Section 2 of this act


2807.11 of this title; and


44. Sales of firearm ammunition. For purposes of this


paragraph, “firearm” means a gun, rifle, pistol, or shotgun.

Req. No. 736 Page 21


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-736 QD 12/30/2024 5:20:03 PM











































Req. No. 736 Page 22